Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,124
Act, how construed.

The Nebraska Equal Opportunity in Education Act does not prohibit any educational institution from maintaining separate toilet facilities, locker rooms, or living facilities for the different sexes.

Laws 1982, LB 628, § 11;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3011;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 128.